fi: Käsittelytilat: Aknehoito (AR); Automaattinen/liukuksenoivalo; Karvanpoisto (HR); Manuaalinen ksenonivälähdys; Ihon uudistaminen (SR); Superkarvanpoisto (SHR); Muu
nl: Behandelingsmodi: Acnebehandeling (AR); Auto/glijflits; Ontharing (HR); Handmatige flits; Huidverjonging (SR); Super ontharing (SHR); Andere
de: Behandlungsmodi: Akne-Behandlung (AR); Auto-/Gleitblitz; Haarentfernung (HR); Manueller Blitz; Hautverjüngung (SR); Super-Haarentfernung (SHR); Sonstiges
it: Modalità di trattamento: Trattamento acne (AR); Flash automatico/scorrimento; Rimozione peli (HR); Flash manuale; Ringiovanimento cutaneo (SR); Super rimozione peli (SHR); Altro
ro-RO: Moduri de tratament: Tratament acnee (AR); Puls automat/glisant; Îndepărtare păr (HR); Puls manual; Întinerire piele (SR); Îndepărtare super păr (SHR); Altele
hu: Kezelési módok: Aknekezelés (AR); Auto/sikló villanás; Szőrtelenítés (HR); Manuális villanás; Bőrfiatalítás (SR); Szuper szőrtelenítés (SHR); Egyéb
cs: Režimy ošetření: Léčba akné (AR); Automatický/klouzavý záblesk; Odstranění chloupků (HR); Manuální záblesk; Omlazení pleti (SR); Super odstranění chloupků (SHR); Jiné
bg-BG: Режими на лечение: Лечение на акне (AR); Автоматична/плъзгаща светкавица; Премахване на косми (HR); Ръчна светкавица; Подмладяване на кожата (SR); Супер премахване на косми (SHR); Други
es: Modos de tratamiento: Tratamiento de acné (AR); Flash automático/deslizante; Depilación (HR); Flash manual; Rejuvenecimiento de la piel (SR); Súper depilación (SHR); Otros
vi: Chế độ điều trị: Điều trị mụn (AR); Chớp tự động/lướt; Triệt lông (HR); Chớp thủ công; Trẻ hóa da (SR); Triệt lông siêu tốc (SHR); Khác
zh-CN: 治疗模式: 痤疮治疗 (AR); 自动/滑动闪光; 脱毛 (HR); 手动闪光; 肌肤焕新 (SR); 超级脱毛 (SHR); 其他
zh-TW: 治療模式: 痤瘡治療（AR）; 自動/滑動閃光; 除毛（HR）; 手動閃光; 嫩膚（SR）; 超級除毛（SHR）; 其他
ja: トリートメントモード: ニキビ治療 (AR); オート/グライドフラッシュ; 脱毛 (HR); マニュアルフラッシュ; 肌再生 (SR); スーパー脱毛 (SHR); その他
ru: Режимы обработки: Лечение акне (AR); Автоматическая/скользящая вспышка; Удаление волос (HR); Ручная вспышка; Омоложение кожи (SR); Супер удаление волос (SHR); Другой
ko: 치료 모드: 여드름 치료 (AR); 자동/글라이드 플래시; 제모 (HR); 수동 플래시; 피부 회춘 (SR); 초고속 제모 (SHR); 기타
en: Treatment modes: Acne treatment (AR); Auto/Glide flash; Hair removal (HR); Manual flash; Skin rejuvenation (SR); Super hair removal (SHR); Other
da: Behandlingstilstande: Aknebehandling (AR); Auto/glide flash; Hårfjerning (HR); Manuel flash; Hudforyngelse (SR); Super hårfjerning (SHR); Andet
sv: Behandlingslägen: Aknebehandling (AR); Auto/glid-blixt; Hårborttagning (HR); Manuell blixt; Hudförnyelse (SR); Super hårborttagning (SHR); Övrigt
sl-SI: Načini tretiranja: Zdravljenje aken (AR); Samodejni/drsni blisk; Odstranjevanje dlak (HR); Ročni blisk; Pomlajevanje kože (SR); Super odstranjevanje dlak (SHR); Drugo
pt-BR: Modos de tratamento: Tratamento de acne (AR); Flash automático/deslizante; Remoção de pelos (HR); Flash manual; Rejuvenescimento da pele (SR); Super remoção de pelos (SHR); Outro
el: Λειτουργίες θεραπείας: Θεραπεία ακμής (AR); Αυτόματο/συρόμενο φλας; Αποτρίχωση (HR); Χειροκίνητο φλας; Αναζωογόνηση δέρματος (SR); Υπερ-αποτρίχωση (SHR); Άλλο
sk-SK: Režimy ošetrenia: Liečba akné (AR); Automatický/klzný záblesk; Odstraňovanie chĺpkov (HR); Manuálny záblesk; Omladenie pleti (SR); Super odstraňovanie chĺpkov (SHR); Iné
lt-LT: Gydymo režimai: Aknės gydymas (AR); Automatinis/slydimo blykstė; Plaukų šalinimas (HR); Rankinė blykstė; Odos atjauninimas (SR); Super plaukų šalinimas (SHR); Kita
pt-PT: Modos de tratamento: Tratamento de acne (AR); Flash automático/deslizante; Remoção de pelos (HR); Flash manual; Rejuvenescimento da pele (SR); Super remoção de pelos (SHR); Outro
hr-HR: Načini tretmana: Tretman akni (AR); Auto/klizno blješćanje; Uklanjanje dlačica (HR); Ručno blješćanje; Pomlađivanje kože (SR); Super uklanjanje dlačica (SHR); Ostalo
nb: Behandlingsmoduser: Aknebehandling (AR); Auto/glideblits; Hårfjerning (HR); Manuell blits; Hudforyngelse (SR); Superhårfjerning (SHR); Annet
pl: Tryby zabiegów: Leczenie trądziku (AR); Błysk automatyczny/przesuwny; Usuwanie włosów (HR); Błysk manualny; Odmładzanie skóry (SR); Super usuwanie włosów (SHR); Inne
th: โหมดการรักษา: การรักษาสิว (AR); แฟลชอัตโนมัติ/ไถล; การกำจัดขน (HR); แฟลชแบบแมนนวล; การฟื้นฟูผิว (SR); การกำจัดขนแบบซูเปอร์ (SHR); อื่นๆ
tr: Tedavi modları: Akne tedavisi (AR); Otomatik/kayar flaş; Tüy alma (HR); Manuel flaş; Cilt gençleştirme (SR); Süper tüy alma (SHR); Diğer
fr: Modes de traitement: Traitement de l'acné (AR); Flash automatique/glissement; Épilation (HR); Flash manuel; Rajeunissement cutané (SR); Super épilation (SHR); Autre